test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-xaradTS_gt-norm.yaml
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюдаць
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюдонзь
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардон
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардод
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардода
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардониʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардодиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардодиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардонаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардодаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хардодоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардонась
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардодась
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардодась
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардонинзь
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардодинзь
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардодинзь
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардонаць
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардодаць
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардодонзь
     харад+N+Tra: хардаӈэ
     харад+N+Car: хардасиˮ
     харад+N+Equ: хардӑдремʼ
     харад+N+Equ+Lat: хардӑдревʼ
